Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2862
Temporary educational permit; recommendation for issuance; by whom.

The recommendation of the board to the department for the issuance of any temporary educational permits shall be made at regular meetings of the board, but the chairperson or one other member of the board, as specifically selected by the members of the board, and its executive secretary, jointly shall have the power to recommend to the department the issuance of such permits between the meetings of the board.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 122;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.29;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 958.